Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.010

Purpose.

It shall be the intent and purpose of this chapter to establish educational service districts as regional agencies which are intended to:

(1) Provide cooperative and informational services to local school districts;

(2) Assist the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education in the performance of their respective statutory or constitutional duties; and

(3) Provide services to school districts and to the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth and the school for the blind to assure equal educational opportunities.

[ 2019 c 266 s 15; 2009 c 381 s 25; 1988 c 65 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.21.010, 28.19.500.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 381: See note following RCW 72.40.015.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 26.]

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 45.]

Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: "The amendment or repeal of any section referred to herein shall not be construed as affecting any existing right acquired under the provisions of the statutes amended or repealed nor any rule, regulation or order adopted pursuant thereto nor as affecting any proceeding as instituted thereunder." [ 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 160.]

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 161.]